Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-126 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any individual who holds a valid lifetime hunting and
fishing license issued by this state may request the inclusion of a
"Lifetime Hunting and Fishing", "Lifetime Hunting" or "Lifetime
Fishing" designation on their state driver license or state
identification card. Proof of eligibility shall include, but may
not be limited to, presentation of the original or digital
certificate of the lifetime license issued by the Department of
Wildlife Conservation. Service Oklahoma shall coordinate with the
Req. No. 10738 Page 1

Depa rtment to verify the validity of the applicant's lifetime
hunting and fishing license.
B. An applicant may request the designation at the time of
driver license or state identification card issuance, renewal, or
replacement for no additional fee or an applicant can request a
replacement license at any time to add the designation for a fee of
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) in accordance with Section 6-114 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The designation shall appear as
a symbol, text, or icon as determined by Service Oklahoma in
consultation with the Department.
C. Service Oklahoma shall remove the designation if the
lifetime hunting and fishing license is revoked or invalidated by
the Department.
D. Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate any necessary
rules to implement this section, including coordination with the
Department or updates to driver license design systems.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10738 JBH 12/16/24





Req. No. 10738 Page 2